Vermont, session 2025-2026, S55.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. REFERENCE-BASED PRICING PLAN; GREEN MOUNTAIN
CARE BOARD; REPORT
(a) The Green Mountain Care Board shall develop a plan for implementing
reference-based pricing for inpatient and outpatient hospital services in
Vermont, including:
(1) a timeline for implementing reference-based pricing that would
extend gradually to include all inpatient and outpatient hospital services across
all health insurance plans and payer types, to the extent permitted under federal
law;
VT LEG #380173 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.55
2025 Page 2 of 3
(2) recommendations for initial benchmark rates for reference-based
pricing, expressed as a percentage of Medicare rates, and a methodology for
making future adjustments to the rates and referenced prices, including a
recommendation on whether future adjustments should be varied for different
types of services;
(3) estimated potential savings from using reference-based pricing;
(4) methods for using reference-based pricing to ensure quality of care
and access to care;
(5) recommendations for protecting Vermonters against balance billing
by providers for amounts in excess of the reference-based prices;
(6) methods for measuring the impacts of using reference-based pricing
on hospitals and recommendations for mitigating any adverse impacts to these
providers;
(7) how reference-based pricing would align with the State’s health care
reform efforts, including any agreements with the federal government
involving Medicare or Medicaid, or both, and other payment reform initiatives;
(8) how the Board would integrate reference-based pricing into its
hospital budget and health insurance rate review processes; and
(9) the Board’s additional staffing and other resource needs in order to
successfully implement reference-based pricing.
VT LEG #380173 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.55
2025 Page 3 of 3
(b) On or before February 1, 2026, the Board shall submit its reference-
based pricing implementation plan to the House Committee on Health Care
and the Senate Committees on Health and Welfare and on Finance, along with
a recommendation regarding whether reference-based pricing should be
implemented for nonhospital services, as well and, if so, a proposed timeline
for broader implementation.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380173 v.2